hytex/sme-hyph.dic
.a2
.ab1
.ad1
.agg1
.ak1
.aln1
.an1a
.aná1
.and1
.ang1
.ani1
.ant1
.ap1
.ap2r
.ara1
.ará1
.ase1
.at2r
.au2
.áin1
.álo1
.á1me
.á1re
.árg1
.árt1
.á1še
.b2
.bak1
.bbu1
.bod1
.bug1
.cá1g
.cá1r
.col1
.co1s
.čad1
.ča1g
.dan1
.da2s
.dád1
.dá1ž
.dek1
.des1
.dia1
.di1o
.d2o
.dog1
.dud1
.ebe2
.e1g
.e1j
.e2l
.el1o
.emo1
.ere1
.e2s
.es1p
.f2
.fad1
.fag1
.fi2e
.fig1
.g2
.ga1ž
.gid1
.god1
.gud1
.hat1
.h2o
.i2dn
.i1do
.i2e
.ii1l
.iko1
.in1s
.int1
.ir1d
.ire1
.irg1
.iso1
.jab1
.ja1m
.jád1
.jes1
.k2
.kao1
.kap1
.kar1
.kas1
.ke1l
.klá1
.kle1
.ko1d
.ko1k
.ko2n
.lad1
.lan1
.lád1
.lod1
.lol1
.mac1
.mad1
.mag1
.mak1
.mao1
.mák1
.me1g
.mi2
.m2o
.mu1m
.n2
.nág1
.neg1
.neo1
.nod1
.nol1
.o2a
.ola1
.opa1
.ose1
.pa1k
.pas1
.pat1
.pi1e
.pio1
.p2o
.pol1
.p2r
.pro2
.rat1
.red1
.reg1
.rek1
.rem1
.rid1
.rod1
.rul1
.s2
.san1
.sas1
.si1o
.sod1
.so1s
.st2
.syk1
.š2
.šad1
.t2
.tas1
.ta1t
.tek1
.tes1
.tu1m
.ud1
.ula1
.u1na
.uri1
.vad1
.vád1
.vid1
.vig1
aa1
a1ak
a1al
a1ar
a1á
aái1
a1b
a2ba
a2bl
a2bm
a2bu
2ac
a1ca
acci1
aceš1
ačče1
a2da1
adá1ž
adek1
a1dem
a1di
a2dii
a2din
adi1r
a2dit
a2div
admi1
a2dn
a1d2o
ad1r
a1du
a2duv
1adv
ađe2
a1ea
aeas1
a1e1d
a1ei
a1el
aes1
aesk2
a1eu
a1ev
a1f
afá1r
affi1
a2f1r
a2gač
a2gan
a2gav
a2geb
a2geš
a2get
agga2
a2gii
aglo1
ag2no
a1go
a2gođ
a2goh
ag1r
a2gut
2ah
a1hač
a1had
a1hal
a2hat
a1haž
a2hem
a2het
a2hi
ahká2
ah1l
ahto1
ahu1m
ai1b2
ai2du
ai1l
ai1sa
a1ism
a1j
ajá2
ajje2
a1ka
a2ke
ake2m
a1kl
2a1ko
akon1
a2k1r
aks2
akto1
aku1m
akva1
a1l
a2lab
a2lam
alas1
a2lat
alá2l
alá2m
1alár
alás1
al2di
a2le
1alf
ali1d
a2lii
alin1
a2liv
2all
al1oa
alo1b
alsi1
al1tr
a2lu
alu1m
aluš1
2ama
a2ma.
a2mag
a2mam
ame1d
ame1l
amet1
amo1r
2amš
a1muo
a1mur
a1nag
a1nai
an1ar
aná1r
ance2
anda1
a1ne.
anen1
ani1d
anil1
a2n1j
a2no
1anog
an2ol
an1os
anso1
anže1
a1ŋi
a1ŋu
a1o
ao2a
ao2i1
ao1s
a1p
aper2
aplá1
appo1
a2pr
a1ra
ara2h
arat1
a1rá
ar2d
a1reb
a1res
ariá1
arne1
a1ro
aro2n
arpe1
1artr
a1sai
a1sam
a1sas
a2sav
a2s1á
asár1
asci1
a2sh
as1hi
asis1
as1j
a2sk
as1l
asmo1
a2so
aso1s
as1p
as2t
astá2
a2su2
asui1
2aš
a2ša
aš1áh
a2ši
a1šoh
aš2t
a2šuh
a2šum
a2šus
a1ta
ate1g
atek1
aten1
ates1
at1h
atni2
a2t1o
a2tr
a1t2rá
attá2
au1b
au1d
a1ul
au1m
au1n
aur1
auto1
a1uv
a2viđ
a1vih
a1vir
a1vis
a1vit
avje1
ax1
ay2
a1ya
a1yb
azze1
a2žan
a2žat
a2že
a2ži
ažže1
á2b
ábbe1
áda2n
á1deh
á2det
á2di
á2dn
á1dr
á1du
á2duh
á2dut
á2duv
áđe2
á1e
á1f
áfá2
á2f1r
áfrá2
ágas1
ági1d
á1hag
á2he
á2hi
áhte1
á1hu
áhu1m
2ái
ái1b2m
ái1d2n
áipa1
áira2
áis2t
áito1
áiva1
á1j
ájá2
á2k
ák1r
ákto1
á1l
ál2d
á2le
álo1b
álo2n
álpa1
á2lu
álu2m
álva1
á2me.
á1men
á2met
ámi2
ámot2
á1na
á2nan
ánaž2
á1neb
áne1j
án2g
á2nis
á2n1j
ánse2
á2nu
á1ŋi1
á1ŋu
á1o
áp1
á1ra
ára2l
áras1
á2raš
á1rá
árá1h
á1rem
á1res
á1rev
árga2
á2ris
á1ro
áro1b
árra1
árre1
á2rut
á2s
á1sa
ása2l
ásár1
ási2
ásis2
ás1ko
ás1om
áso2n
ássa2
ás2ti
ás1uv
áš2go
áštu1
át1h
á2to
á1ŧ
ávár1
ávás2
á1vi
ávri1
ávva2
áze1
ázo2
á2ž
1b2a
ba2de
badi1
ba2du
ba2h
1ba2n
ba2s
bas1h
ba2š
ba1ž
baža1
1bá2
2b1b
bba1g
bble2
b2b1oa
bb2r
bbre1
bbu2
bbu1s
2b1d
bdu1s
1b2e
2beah
1beai
2beč
be2gi
be2go
2beh
beju1
be1li
1bem
be2ma
ben1
ber1t
be2se
b1f
bfi1
b1g
1b2i
bi2b
bid1
bi2e
bi2me
bio1
bi1oh
bio1s
bi2sa
bi2si
bis2t
biva1
biža1
b1j
b1k
b1l2
1b2lá
2bli
1blo
b1m2
bmil2
bmo2
bmo1a
bmo1s
1b2o2
boar1
bok1
b1olb
bold1
b1p
bplá1
b1ra
2brá
b1rá1n
b1re
bre1d
brii1
bro1d
b1s
bsen1
bs2k
bs1t2
bs2ti1
bsur1
1b2u
bud1
buon1
bu2s
buvi1
1by
by2s
2b'
ca2d
ca2gi
ca2go
ca2h
ca2l
ca2mo
ca2n
ca2se
ca2si
ca2š
1cá
cá1ha
cá2j
cá2l
cá2m
cás2k
c1b
2c1c
ccen1
c2da
cdde1
1c2e
ce2d
ce1le
ce2ma
ce2se
c1g
c2h
2che
ch1l
1c2i
ci2k
ci1n
ci2to
ci2v
2c1k
ckli1
c2kr
c2o
2coa
co2b
co1h
co2l
co2m
come1
core2
cos2
cosi1
cot2t
c2s
c1t
1c2u
cu2b
cu2l
cu2m
cu2s
1c2y
1ča
ča2ga
ča2gi
ča2gu
ča2h
ča2li
ča1n
ča2ni
čarg1
ča2s
čat1
čava1
1čá2
čárt1
čás1t
2č1č
ččás2
ččo1b
ččo2l
čču1m
1če
če2ma
če2s
1či
čis2t
či2vi
1č2o
čoa1n
čo2b
čo2d
čo2h
čo2r
čoso2
čos2t
čovd1
1ču
ču2go
čuld1
ču2m
1d2a
da2d
2dadd
da2gi
da2h
daid1
2damo
2dan
dan1o
da2r
da1s
da2se
da2si
da2š
1d2á
dáđg1
dág1
dá2r
2d1b
d1č
2d1d2
dda2
ddá2
dde2m
ddi2
d2dir
d2doa
d2e
2dea
dean1
1debe
2de2d
1dee
defi1
1deg
2dei
1deik
de2j
1dek
1del
1dema
1demu
1den1
1deo
2dep
1der
de2ru
1de2s
2deš
1detb
2detn
de1t2r
2dett
1dev
de2ž
1deže
1dé
2d1g
dhá1
dhe1
d1ho
1di.
1d2ia
diá1
1dib
di1c
di2d
did2j
1diđ
1di2e
1dif
1dig
di2go
1dih
1diij
1diim
1di2k
1dil
1dim
1dine
1dio
di1ok
dio2n
dip1
1dise
dis1l
1dism
dis2t
2diš
d2it
1dite
1diti
1dito
diva1
divr1
1divš
d1j
djis2
dju2
d1k
d1l
2d1m
d1n
1d2na
2dnai
2dná2
d2nj
dno2
1do.
1do2b
1do2d
2doe
1dof
1d2og
1do2h
1do2i
1doj
1d2ok
d1o2l
1dola
1do2le
2dolg
1doll
1do2lu
1d2o2m
1don
do2r
1dorj
1dors
1do2s
do1sa
1doš
1dot
dot2t
1dovd
1dovi
1dož
2d1p
dpo1
dpro1
d2r2
d1ra
1dres
d1ro
d1s2
d1š
2dt2
d2u
1du.
1duc
1dug
duga1
du2go
1dui
dui1s2
1duk
1dul
du1m
du2mu
1dun
1duo
2dup
1dur
1dusa
1dusb
1duse
du2si
1dusj
1dusk
1duss
1dusv
1dutk
1duva
2duvv
2d1v
dven1
1dy
dy2s
1đa2
1đá2
đ1b2m
2đ1đ
1đe
đe2m
đe2s
2đg
đga2
đge1
đgi2
đ1g2ŋ
đ1go
1đi2
2đ1j
đje1j
2đk
2đm
2đŋ
1đo2
2đp
1đu2
đu2le
đu1m
2đv
đve1
đ1vi
đvu2
e2a
ead1
eaga1
eaju1
eak1
ea1m
ea1na
eane1
e1ano
ea1šo
e1atu
ea1vi
e1á
e2b
eb1r
ec1
ecce2
ech1
ečie1
e2da
edde1
e2de
ede2g
e1di
edis1
e2dj
e1d2o
edov1
edur1
e1e
eepe2
ee1s
e1fe
ef1l
e2ga
egga2
eg2n
ego1b
e2gođ
ego2i1
e1g2r
2e2h
ehá1
ehká2
ehu1m
ei1b2m
ei1d2n
e1i2e
eiin1
ei1le
ei1r
ei1sa
eis2k
e1ja
e1jik
e2jin
e1jo
e2ju
e2k
eká1
ekko2
ek1l
ekŋa1
1ekon
ekor1
eksa1
e1lah
ela2l
e1las
elaš1
e1lá
e1leg
e1leh
el1ek
e2lep
eles1
e1leš1
elio1
e2lis
el1n
el1oa
elo1k
elo2l
el1sk
e1lud
e1luo
el1uv
e1m
emát2
e2me
emi2e
e2min
e2mo
empe1
empo2
e1n
2ena
en1ap
e2nis
e2n1j
e2no
en1os
en2t1
e1o
eo1b
eo2n
eo1p
eo2s2
eosk2
eot2
ep1
ep2o
e1p2r
e1pu
e1r
2e2ra
er1ak
e2r1ár
2erb
2erc
er1dr
2erg
ergo1
e2rit1
e2riv
erko2
erku1
2erp
2err
2ert
erti1
2eru
eru1b
2erv
erva1
e1sa
e2sab
e2sea
ese1d
esen1
e2set
e2sis
e2sj
e1s2ká
es1ko
es1l
es1m
e1sp
es1r
es2t
2e2š
eš2g
eš1o
eš2ta
eš2ti
eš2tu
2et
e1ta
e2táv
etc1
ete1
et1h
e2to
etu1
eu1
e1um.
e1uma
e1ume
e1umm
2ev
eva1
evh1
e2vi
e1vii
e1y
ey2n
ey2s2
e1žag
e2že
e2ži
e1ä
é1a
éask2
éat2
é1l
1fa2
fau1
1f2á
fág1
fá2h
fá2j
fá1mu
fá2ra
fá2ri
fáro1
fá1ši
f2e
fe1d
fede1
feno1
1fé
2f1f2
ffá2l
ffe1i
ffi1s
ffu1m
1f2i
fia2n
fi2dn
fi2le
fi2me
fi1o1
fi2r
fi2sk
fis1p
1f2la
f2lo
flo1t
1f2o2
foku1
foto1
fra1s
frá1
frek1
f2ru
2f1t
fta1
1f2u
1fy
fy1s
1g2a
ga2b
ga2d
ga2e
ga2ga
ga2go
ga2h
ga2li
2gamo
ga1mu
ga2n
ga2r
ga2s
gas1h
ga2šá
gaše1
gat2t
ga2u
2gažž
1g2á
gád2
gá2h
gá2n
gáv1s
2gb
g1di
1g2e
2geam
2geas
2geat
ge2d
2gei
geid1
ge2ji
ge2ma
gen1o
gen1s
gerá1
ge1u
2g1g2
gga2l
gga2š
ggá2
ggu2
2g1h
1g2i
gi2d
gi2e
gi2k
gi2l
gi1lu
gi2m
gi1o
gip1
gi2ra
2gis
gis2t
2giš
giti1
gi2vi
g1j
2g1k
2g2l
glas1
glá1
gle1
glo1b
2g1m
2g1n
gnos1
g1ŋ
1gŋir
gŋu1m
g2o
1go.
1goal
1goap
1goar
1go2b
1go2d
1gog
go2h
1goha
1gohu
1gok
1go2l
1go2m
gono1
1gor
1go2s
1goš
goš2t
1got
gote1
1gov
1gož
1graf
1gram
grá1d
1gráf
1g2re
gril1
g1ro
gro1t
2g1s
gs2k
gs1r
gsre1
g2su
2gš
2gt
1g2u
gu2d
gu2g
gulá1
gu2si
2g1v
1gy
gyne1
2g'
2hab
had1
1hah
ha1ha
hahr1
2haht
1hal.
1hala
2ham
1hame1
ha2n
1hann
1hanš
hard1
ha1re
1has
ha1sa
1hašt
1hatc
1hatč
1hatd
1hatg
1hav
1haw
1haži
1há
há2ma
há1me
háse2
há1še
há1ši
h1b2
2hc
h1ca
hci2
h1co2
hco1b
hča2l
hčo2l
h1d
1he
2heab
2heb1
hege1
hehe1
hemo1
2heo
2hep
herá1
hero1
hes1
hets1
h1h
1hi.
1hia
1hib
hi2e
hie1g
1hik
1hil1d
1him
hi2me
1hine
1hing
hio2
hi1sa
1hisb
1hisv
2hit
hivg1
1hivu
h1j
hje1
2hk
h1ka
hki2
h1ko2
hku1m
2hl
h1la
h1lá2
h1le
h1li2
hlis2
hlla2
h1lu
h1m
h2n
hne1
hno2n
hnos2
hod1
hoid1
1h2ol
1hoš
hou1
2h1p
hpi2
hpos2
h1ra
h1rá
h1re
2h1t
hta2g
htá2
hte1g
hte2r
hto2s
htu1m
h2u
1hui
1huk
hul1
hu1na
hu1ne
1huo
huo1n
hu2p
1hup.
1hupa
1hupb
1hupe
1hupi
1hupl
1hupv
2hus.
1husa
1husg
1husm
1huss
1huš
1hutt
1huu
2huv
1hy
hyt1
2h'
i1a
ia1g2
ia2h
ia2se
iask2
iat2
i1á
iála1
iára1
i2ba
i1be
ibi1l
i2bu
i1ca2
ice2n
ic2k1
i1co
icu1
2id
ida2g
ida2l
ida2n
i2dat
idá2
iddi1
i1de
i2deh
i2des
i2dež
i2d1h
id2i
i1dii
i2din
i2dis
i2dj
id2ni
i2d1oa
id2ol
id1ov
i1du
i2duh
i1đ
i1ea
ied1
iega1
ie1go
i2el
ie1la
ie1lu
i1em
ie2ni
i1ens
i1er
ierá2
i2erk
i2ero1
ies1
iese1
ieš1
i1et
ievd1
i1evr
ie1ž
i1f
i2f1l
i2f1r
2i1g
iga2l
i2gŋ
i2gođ
igre1
igro1
i2h
ihca1
ihti2
ihto1
ihu1m
2i2i
ii1b2m
ii1d2n
ii1le2
ii1r
ii1sa1
i1ism
iis2t
iite1
i1j
ije2
i1ka
ikcu1
ikká1
i1ko
iko2l
iko2m
iko1s
ik1r
ik2ri
ikro1
iksu1
ikti2
i1la2
i2lab
i1lá2
1ilbm
il2da
il2du
i1leg
i1li
ille2
1ilmm
il1oa
ilo1s
il1sk
i1lu
2i1m
i2ma
1imal
imás1
i2mii
imp1
impe1
imse1
i2mu
2i2n
in1ak
in1au
in1es
in1j
intá2
in2tr
i1nu
iŋge2
i1oa
io1d
i1oht
io1p2
i1or
i1o1s1
io1š
io1t2
i1ov
ipo1
i1pu2
i1ra
i2ran
i1rá
irba1
ir2du
i1reg
i1rer
i2ri
i1ro
iro2d
i2rut
is1a
i1sab
isa2d
i1san
isat2
ise2n1
i2set
is1h
i2sid1
i2sin
is1j
is1ko2
is1lá
i2sp
is1r
isre1
2ist
is1ta
is2tu
i1še
i1šo
i1ta1
i2ták
itc1
it1h
it2la
it2le
it2lu
itno1
ito2m
ito1s
itro1
itte1
i1u
iu1m
2iv
iva2l
ive2n
i1vi
ivi1d
i2viđ
ivu2
i1z
i1ža
i1že
i1ži
j2a
ja2b
ja2d
ja2go
jagu1
ja2h
ja2l
1jale
1jalg
ja2mo
ja2n
ja2ni
1janl
ja2s
1jash
1jasi
ja2t1
1já
já2da
já1h
já2ji
já2mo
já2n
járe1
já1z
já1ži
1jeak
jeas1
1jeav
je1b
jeba1
je2di
1jek
je2la
1jen
1jeŋ
1jer
jes1
1jest
j2i2
jid1
j1il
jilo2
jiso2
2j1j
jja1g
jja1k
jjá2
jješ1
jjis2
j2o2
j1oai
1joav
1joh.
j1oiv
1joŋ
1jor.
1jorb
jord1
1jori
jou1l
1jov
1jovk
1jože
2js
jsi2
j2u
1jud
1juga
ju2go
ju1m
1juol
1jurd
ju2s
jus1t
1juvl
j1v
2j'
k2a2
1kab
kabi1
2kač
1kad
1kag
ka1h
1kahi
kaku1
1kal
1kam
kame1
2kand
1kani
1kao
1kap
1karo
kar1t
kas1h
1kasi
kask2
1kass
1kato
kat2t
1kav
1k2á
ká2d
ká2h
ká2j
ká2mo
2k1áŋ
ká2r
ká2š
2kb
k1c
kca2
k1č
kča2
kči2
1k2e
ke2d
keru1
ke2s
1ké
2k1f
2kg
k1h
1ki
ki1b
ki1d
ki2g
ki2l
ki2m
ki1o
ki2s
kis2t
2k1k2
kká2l
kká2n
kke2
kki2
kkli1
kko1b
kko2l
kko2n
kkor1
kkre1
kku1m
kku1p
1kla
kla1r
1k2lá1
1klei
k2li
2km
2k2n
knál1
2k1ŋ
kŋa2b
kŋo1h
k2o
ko1ag
koai1
ko1al
ko1an
k1oap
1kob
1kod
ko2h
1kok
ko2la
kolá1
1kolo
ko2lu
komp1
1kon
ko2na
ko1n2j
1kor1d
1kos
kosi1
1koš
1kot
1kož
1kr
kra1
k1ro1s
2k1s
ksa2b
ksa2m
ksa2n
ksá2
ksek1
kse2n
ks2f
ks2h
ksha1
ksi2s
ksit2
ks2j
k2sk
ks2ku
kso2l
kso2m
kso1s
k2s1p
ks2pi
ks1t2
ks2ta
ks2tá
ks2te
ks2ti
ks2to
ks2tu
ksu1m
ksy1
2k1š
kše2
2k1t
kta2g
kta1r
ktá2j
ktá2l
kte2m
kto2m
kto2n
1ku
ku2go
kulo1
k2um
ku2mo
kupe1
kur1d
ku2s
k2v
kvad1
kvin1
2kvu
k1w
1kyl
2k'1
l2a
1laa
1labi
1lač
la2d
2ladd
1ladi
1lađ
lađg1
1laga
lagi1
la2go
la2h
1laha
1lahe
1lahi
1lahk
1lahu
1lai
1lal
1lamu
la2n
1lana
1lanu
la1re
1larm
la2s
1lask
1last
1lašo
1lašu
1lath
1lati
1lav
la1y
1laža
1laže
1laži
1láč
1lágá
lági1
lá1ha
1láhk
1lái
1lámp
lá1ne
1lá2r
1lár.
1lárp
1láš
2l1b2
lbea1
2l1c
lci1
2l1č
lča2
lčča2
lčče2
lči2
lčo2
2ld
l2da.
l1de
l2dem
l2dež
l1di
l2dit
l1dn
l1do
l1du
1lead
1lean
1lebe
2le2d
1ledd
1lef
lega1
1lege
le2go
1lehi
2lei
le1j
le2je
1leky
1lel
1lena
lend1
1leni
1lens
1lent
1ler
1les
le2sa
le2se
le2sk
1lešt
1lešv
1let
leu2
1levi
1levu
1lex
1lež
le1ža
2ležž
1lé
2l1f
lfes1
2lg
l1g2ŋ
l1go2
2l1h
l2i
1li.
1lib
lic1
lid1
li1di
1lie.
1lieg
1lieh
1liei
lien1
1lier
1lies
1lif
1li2g
1lih
1liij
1liil
1lik1
li2ke
li2la
1limi
2lin
lin1o
1lio
li2ov
lip1
1lipt
1lir.
1lir2d
1lirh
1lirk
1lirm
1li1sa
1lise
1lisi
1lisj
1lism
2liš
2lit
1liu
1liva
li2vi
1livv
2l1j
l1je
l2ji
ljos1
2lk
l1ka
l1ko2
2l1l
lla2m
lla2r
llá2
lle1
lle2n
lle2ž
lli2k
ll2j
llo2
llu1m
2l1m
l2muh
2ln
l1ne
l1nj
1lo
2loa
lo1am
lobu1
lo2d
l2oh
lo2la
lo2lu
l2on
lo2nj
lono1
lope1
lora2
los2s
l2ot
2lp
l1pu
l1r
2ls
l1sa
ls2k
ls1l
ls2t
2lš
lša1
l1še
l1ši
l1šo
2lt
l1ta
1lu.
1ludd
1ludi
1luen
2luer
lu2go
1luhe
1luhi
1luhu
1lui
1luke
lu2l
lu2mo
1lumu
1lun.
1lunt
1luoa
l2up
1lusa
1luse
1lusm
1lust
1luš
1luth
1luti
1lutk
1luva
1luvu
2luvv
2l1v
lvi1
lvva2
2ly
2lž
l1ža
l1že
l1ži
l1ø
2l'
1ma2
2mamo
mask2
1má2
máj1
2m1b
mba2
mbio1
mb2l
mb2r
mbrá1
mbu1
mc2
2m1č
2m1d
1mean
2meap
2meat
1me1b
1med
medi1
1meg
mega1
1meh
meid1
meju1
1mel
me1la
me2ma
memb1
men1
1mena
1mená
1menc
1mene
1menf
1menh
1meni
1menk
1mens
1ment
1meo
2mep
1mer
1mes
me2se
1metá
1metb
1meto1
1metr
1mett
1mev
me2ž
2m1f
mfis2
mfit2
2mg
2m1h
1mi
m1i2a2
mian1
mi2bi
mi1d2
mi2go
mi2ke
mi2l
milo1
mi2me
misk2
mis2t
m2it1
mit2t
mi2vi
2m1l
2m1m2
mmo2d
mmo2r
mmu1n
mmu2s
2m1n
mnas1
mná1
mnes1
1mo
2m1oa
mobi1
mo2g
mo2h
mo2l
mo2m
mo2n
mon2d1
mopo1
mo2ra
mori1
mo2sa
mosk2
mos2t
2m1p
mpi2
mple1
